Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB972.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1538 of the act of May 1, 1933 (P.L.103, No.69), known as The Second Class Township Code, is amended to read:Section 1538. [Care of Memorials.--The board of supervisors may maintain and repair any soldiers' monument or memorial existing or erected within the township and may receive funds from persons or organizations for those purposes.] Control, Maintenance and Repair of Memorials.--(a) A board of supervisors may maintain, repair, establish or contribute to the maintenance, repair or establishment of any memorial and may receive money from persons or organizations for those purposes.(b) As used in this section, the term "memorials" means:12345678910111213141516171819 (1) a monument, gun or carriage, memorial or memorial hall erected or existing within the township and commemorating or honoring the services of any individual who has served in the Pennsylvania National Guard or any of the armed forces of the United States or their reserve components; or(2) a monument or memorial erected or existing within the township and commemorating or honoring first responders, including firefighters, emergency medical technicians, paramedics, emergency vehicle drivers and township police officers.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0972PN1113 - 2 - 1234567891011